New York, session 2025-2026, S10321.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept from 3 the town of Hempstead an application for exemption from real property 4 taxes pursuant to section 406 of the real property tax law with respect 5 to the 2024-2025 assessment rolls for a portion of the 2024-2025 school 6 taxes and with respect to all of the 2025-2026 assessment rolls for the 7 entire 2025-2026 school year and all of the 2025 and 2026 general taxes 8 for the parcel conveyed to such municipal corporation located at 434 9 Hempstead Turnpike, hamlet of West Hempstead, town of Hempstead, county 10 of Nassau, otherwise known as Nassau county parcel ID section 33 block 11 614 lots 26-28 and 71. If accepted, the application shall be reviewed 12 as if it had been received on or before the taxable status date estab- 13 lished for such roll. 14 If satisfied that such municipal corporation would otherwise be enti- 15 tled to such exemption if such municipal corporation had filed an appli- 16 cation for exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the asses- 17 sor, upon approval by the Nassau county legislature, may make 18 appropriate correction to the subject rolls. If such exemption is grant- 19 ed and such municipal corporation, therefore, shall have paid any tax 20 with respect to the subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax 21 department may, in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of those 22 taxes paid and cancel those taxes, fines, penalties, liens or interest 23 remaining unpaid. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13939-01-5